Texas, session 892, HB313.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subchapter A, Chapter 501, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 501.028 to read as follows: Sec. 501.028.  TEMPERATURE REQUIREMENTS AT DEPARTMENT FACILITIES. The department shall ensure that the temperature in each facility operated by the department is maintained at not less than 65 degrees Fahrenheit or more than 85 degrees Fahrenheit. SECTION 2.  The Texas Department of Criminal Justice is not required to comply with the requirements of Section 501.028, Government Code, as added by this Act, until September 1, 2026. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.